District of Columbia statutes.
27-133

Failure to make prompt payments to a contractor.

If an owner fails to make prompt payments to a contractor as required by section 3, the owner shall:

(1)

Pay interest of 1.5% per month or any part of a month to the contractor on any undisputed amount not paid on time to the contractor; and

(2)

If a contractor prevails in a civil action to collect interest penalties from an owner, the contractor shall be awarded its costs and disbursements, including reasonable attorney’s fees, incurred in bringing the action.

Nov. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 20-34, § 4, 60 DCR 11812